dictsource/mn_rules
// ***************************************************************************/
// *   Mongolian (Khalkha Cyrillic) spelling-to-phoneme rules  mn_rules      *
// *   Original Author Battseren Badral 15-05-2025                           *
// *   Contact info: bbattseren88@gmail.com                                  *
// ***************************************************************************/
// *   This program is free software; you can redistribute it and/or modify  *
// *   it under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by  *
// *   the Free Software Foundation; either version 3 of the License, or     *
// *   (at your option) any later version.                                   *
// *                                                                         *
// *   This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,       *
// *   but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of        *
// *   MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the         *
// *   GNU General Public License for more details.                          *
// *                                                                         *
// *   You should have received a copy of the GNU General Public License     *
// *   along with this program; if not, see:                                 *
// *               <http://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.                           *
// ***************************************************************************/

// ============================================================
//  Khalkha Mongolian Spelling-to-Phoneme Rules
//
//  Cyrillic alphabet: а б в г д е ё ж з и й к л м н о ө п р
//                     с т у ү ф х ц ч ш щ ъ ы ь э ю я
//
//  Four phenomena drive nearly every rule in this file:
//
//  1. VOWEL HARMONY. Roots are back {а о у ы я ё ю} or front
//     {э ө ү е}; и is neutral and transparent. Harmony is already
//     spelled out in the vowel letters themselves, so it needs no
//     re-deriving for them -- but it also selects the CONSONANT
//     allophones of г and х, which the spelling does NOT show. That
//     is what the harmony pre-contexts below are for: they make
//     цагийн come out uvular [tsʰaʁiːŋ] while гэрийн stays velar
//     [keriːŋ], from spellings that look alike.
//
//  2. UNSTABLE VOWELS (гээгдэх эгшиг). Short vowels outside the
//     first syllable delete or reduce. See the block comment above
//     the vowel groups for the guards.
//
//  3. ASPIRATION, NOT VOICING. б д г are unaspirated /p t k/,
//     п т к are aspirated /pʰ tʰ kʰ/, з ц are /ts tsʰ/ and
//     ж ч are /tʃ tʃʰ/. Nothing in native Khalkha is voiced.
//
//  4. PALATALISATION. ь palatalises the preceding consonant and is
//     itself silent. Coronals take a dedicated palatalised phoneme;
//     labials and velars take a following [j].
//
//
//  A NOTE ON PRE-CONTEXTS -- why they are spelled out longhand
//
//  Several rules here need to know "what was the nearest vowel to
//  the left, and was it back or front?". The obvious tool is the
//  `J` skip (`L01J)`), and it does work -- but `J` scans past the
//  start of the word into the PREVIOUS word. That silently made
//  `нуруу олон` reduce the initial о of олон, because it found the
//  final у of нуруу. So every lookback below is written out as an
//  explicit ladder instead:
//
//      L01)            vowel immediately before
//      L01L05)         vowel, then one consonant
//      L01L05L05)      vowel, then two consonants
//      L01L05L05L05)   vowel, then three consonants
//
//  The reduction ladder runs one rung further, to four, because ь
//  and ъ are counted as letters even though they are silent:
//  амьдрах has only three consonant SOUNDS between its two vowels
//  but four consonant LETTERS.
//
//  Three intervening consonants is the phonotactic maximum in
//  Mongolian, so the ladder is exhaustive, and it cannot leak
//  across a word boundary. Longer ladder entries score higher than
//  shorter ones and give the same answer, so the overlap is safe.
// ============================================================


// ============================================================
//  LETTER GROUPS
// ============================================================

.L01 а о у ы я ё ю              // back (masculine) vowel letters
.L02 э ө ү е                    // front (feminine) vowel letters
.L03 и                          // neutral, harmonically transparent
.L04 а о у ы э ө ү и е ё ю я    // any vowel letter
.L05 б в г д ж з й к л м н п р с т ф х ц ч ш щ ъ ь   // any consonant letter
//   ъ and ь are silent but they are still letters, so the lookback
//   ladders must be able to step over them: in амьдрах the а of the
//   final syllable is four letters away from the а of the first.
.L06 п т к х ц ч ш с ф щ        // voiceless consonants
.L07 м н л р в                  // sonorant consonants
.L08 я ё ю е и                  // vowels that carry their own /j/
.L09 б в г д ж з к л м н п р с т ф х ц ч ш щ ъ ь   // consonants EXCEPT й
//   L09 exists so that vowel reduction never eats the first half of a
//   diphthong: in зайтай the final ай must stay [aI], not become [@j].
.L10 б в г д ж з й к л м н п р с т ф х ц ч ш щ ъ ь и   // L05 + и
.L11 a e i o u y                // LATIN vowel letters (Latin fallback only)
//   L10 is L05 plus и, and is used for the GAP positions in the г and х
//   harmony ladders only. и is harmonically transparent (.L03) -- it belongs to
//   neither class and does not interrupt harmony -- so the lookback has to be
//   able to step over it just as it steps over a consonant. With only L05 in
//   the gaps the ladder stopped dead at the first и, and back-harmony words
//   took the front allophone: унших came out with velar [x] and голиг with
//   velar [k]. Right contexts stay L05: "х before a consonant" must not start
//   matching и, which has its own rules.


// ============================================================
//  VOWELS
//
//  UNSTABLE-VOWEL DELETION (гээгдэх эгшиг)
//
//  A short а э о ө у ү outside the first syllable is deleted. The
//  rule is guarded so that it cannot produce output no speaker
//  could say:
//
//  G1  Non-initial only. Every deletion and reduction rule requires
//      a vowel earlier in the SAME word (the `L04L05…)` ladder), so
//      the first syllable is never touched.
//
//  G2  Short only. Long vowels (аа, ээ, …) and diphthongs (ай, ой,
//      үй, …) are two-letter matches and carry `+++`, so they beat
//      every one-letter deletion rule.
//
//  G3  Word-final vowels reduce rather than vanish. бага is
//      [paʁə], never [paʁ].
//
//      Reduction is HARMONY-PRESERVING: each vowel reduces to its own
//      short counterpart (а -> a#, ө -> 8#, у -> U#, ...), not to one
//      central schwa. Khalkha reduced vowels keep their harmony class;
//      collapsing them all to @ merges contrasts the language keeps, and
//      measured worse in the ASR round-trip (57.4% vs 58.5% CER).
//      The @ phoneme remains defined for genuinely epenthetic vowels --
//      ones with no letter in the spelling -- which is what it is for.
//
//  G4  Deletion must leave a legal cluster. Full deletion is
//      licensed only when the vowel sits between single consonants
//      and the following one is a sonorant: багана -> [paʁnə].
//      Before an obstruent the vowel becomes @ instead (хотод ->
//      [xɔtət], нутаг -> [nʊtʰəɢ]). Before a two-consonant cluster
//      nothing happens at all -- нэмэлт stays [nemeɬt], because
//      [nmlt] is not sayable.
//
//  G5  A word-final -ан/-эн/-ал/-ам/-… REDUCES; it does not delete.
//      There is no syllabic-sonorant rule: болон is [pɔɬɔ̆ŋ], эзэн
//      [et͡sə̆ŋ], төрөл [tʰɵrɵ̆ɬ], handled by the ordinary (L09_
//      reduction above, the same path that already gave боловсрол
//      [pɔɬɔwsrəɬ].
//
//      An earlier version emitted syllabic [ŋ̩ m̩ ɮ̩] here. Measured
//      against mbspeech over the 184 native words affected, reducing
//      instead was closer to the speaker on MCD (-0.54, CI [-0.73,
//      -0.35]) and on F1 distance (-3.7, CI [-6.0, -1.6]), with F2
//      unchanged. Segment durations were identical between the two,
//      so the MCD gain is not silence dilution. Note this makes
//      оюутан [ɔjʊːtʰə̆ŋ]; the syllabic [ɔjʊːtʰŋ̩] cited for the
//      -тан/-тэн suffix is attested, but that class is too rare in
//      the corpus (11 tokens) to test separately.
//
//  и and ы are exempt throughout. They are the vowels of the
//  genitive and accusative suffixes (-ын, -ийн, -ыг, -ийг), and
//  deleting them would destroy the case system.
// ============================================================

.group а
        аай (+++            a:j
        аа (+++             a:
        ай (+++             aI

        // G4 used to DELETE here, and багана was the one example the rule was
        // written for: it produced p'aQ"na#, [paʁna]. A native speaker says that
        // is wrong -- the vowel is reduced, not lost. Reducing instead makes this
        // consistent with the pre-obstruent case, which already reduces (хотод ->
        // X'OthO#t). Only `а` ever had a deletion rule, so this is the whole of it.
        L04L05) а (L07L04+      a#          // G4 reduce

        L04L05) а (L09_          a#
        L04L05L05) а (L09_       a#
        L04L05L05L05) а (L09_    a#
        L04L05L05L05L05) а (L09_    a#
        L04L05) а (L09L04        a#
        L04L05L05) а (L09L04     a#
        L04L05L05L05) а (L09L04  a#
        L04L05L05L05L05) а (L09L04  a#
        L04L05) а (_             a#
        L04L05L05) а (_          a#
        L04L05L05L05) а (_       a#
        L04L05L05L05L05) а (_       a#

        а                   a

.group э
        ээй (+++            e:j
        ээ (+++             e:
        эй (+++             eI

        L04L05) э (L07L04+

        L04L05) э (L09_          e#
        L04L05L05) э (L09_       e#
        L04L05L05L05) э (L09_    e#
        L04L05L05L05L05) э (L09_    e#
        L04L05) э (L09L04        e#
        L04L05L05) э (L09L04     e#
        L04L05L05L05) э (L09L04  e#
        L04L05L05L05L05) э (L09L04  e#
        L04L05) э (_             e#
        L04L05L05) э (_          e#
        L04L05L05L05) э (_       e#
        L04L05L05L05L05) э (_       e#

        э                   e

.group о
        оой (+++            O:j
        оо (+++             O:
        ой (+++             OI

        L04L05) о (L07L04+

        L04L05) о (L09_          O#
        L04L05L05) о (L09_       O#
        L04L05L05L05) о (L09_    O#
        L04L05L05L05L05) о (L09_    O#
        L04L05) о (L09L04        O#
        L04L05L05) о (L09L04     O#
        L04L05L05L05) о (L09L04  O#
        L04L05L05L05L05) о (L09L04  O#
        L04L05) о (_             O#
        L04L05L05) о (_          O#
        L04L05L05L05) о (_       O#
        L04L05L05L05L05) о (_       O#

        о                   O

.group ө
        өөй (+++            8:j
        өө (+++             8:
        өй (+++             8I

        L04L05) ө (L07L04+

        L04L05) ө (L09_          8#
        L04L05L05) ө (L09_       8#
        L04L05L05L05) ө (L09_    8#
        L04L05L05L05L05) ө (L09_    8#
        L04L05) ө (L09L04        8#
        L04L05L05) ө (L09L04     8#
        L04L05L05L05) ө (L09L04  8#
        L04L05L05L05L05) ө (L09L04  8#
        L04L05) ө (_             8#
        L04L05L05) ө (_          8#
        L04L05L05L05) ө (_       8#
        L04L05L05L05L05) ө (_       8#

        ө                   8

.group у
        ууй (+++            U:j
        уу (+++             U:
        уй (+++             UI

        L04L05) у (L07L04+
